Idaho, session 2026, H0705.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6542, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6542. MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL HOUSING DEVELOPMENTS IN COMMERCIAL
USE ZONES. (1) The legislature finds that Idaho communities face a shortage
of housing close to jobs, schools, and services. Authorizing multifamily
residential housing developments in commercial zones allows developers to
make use of underutilized office space, increase housing supply, reduce com-
mute times, and promote economic growth.
(2) Counties and cities shall permit multifamily residential housing
developments in areas zoned for commercial use in accordance with the provi-
sions of this section and subject to the same siting, design, and development
standards that apply to other commercial use in the same zoning district.
"Commercial use" means any zoning district established by a local government
where the primary permitted uses are retail, office, or other non-residen-
tial commercial activity.
(3) By resolution or ordinance adopted, amended, or repealed in accor-
dance with the notice and hearing procedures provided under section 67-6509,
Idaho Code, each governing board shall amend its comprehensive plan and land
use regulations for all land zoned for commercial use to:
(a) Allow for multifamily residential housing developments in dis-
tricts zoned for commercial use as provided for in this section; and
(b) Prohibit requiring more than one (1) parking space per dwelling
unit within a multifamily residential housing development, unless a
demonstrated site-specific safety or infrastructure capacity concern
justifies additional parking.
(4) Multifamily residential housing development projects that meet the
jurisdiction's established land use requirements shall be approved adminis-
tratively and as a matter of right, without the need for discretionary ap-
proval. Such projects shall not be subject to permitting or review that is
not applied to other projects that are approved as a matter of right in a com-
mercial use zone.
(5) Any approval standards, including siting and design, adopted by a
local government shall be clear and objective and shall not have the effect,


either singularly or cumulatively, of rendering the development of multi-
family residential housing economically infeasible.
(6) A property owner, housing provider, or other affected party may
bring a private cause of action for injunctive relief, monetary damages,
reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief
available under the law to enforce compliance with the provisions of this
section.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Land zoned exclusively for industrial use;
(b) Areas designated as floodplain, steep slope, or critical environ-
mental hazard;
(c) Parcels located within the approach area of an airport runway, de-
fined as one-half (1/2) mile laterally and one (1) mile longitudinally
from the outer limits of a runway protection zone; and
(d) Parcels located within an airport overlay district, airport influ-
ence area, or airport zoning district adopted by a state or local gov-
ernment within the state of Idaho.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.